Hawaii statutes.
§392-25 Eligibility for benefits. An
individual is eligible to receive temporary disability benefits if the
individual has been in employment for at least fourteen weeks during each of
which the individual has received remuneration in any form for twenty or more
hours and earned wages of at least $400, during the fifty-two weeks immediately
preceding the first day of disability. [L 1969, c 148, pt of §1; gen ch 1985;
am L 1999, c 30, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next